src/orthography/Latn-to-Cans.xfscript
! Script for latin to syll for Plains Cree, 
! or more general, for Western Cree

define Decapitalisation [ A -> a , 
                          B -> b ,
                          C -> c ,
                          D -> d ,
                          E -> e ,
                          F -> f ,
                          G -> g ,
                          H -> h ,
                          I -> i ,
                          J -> j ,
                          K -> k ,
                          L -> l ,
                          M -> m ,
                          N -> n ,
                          O -> o ,
                          P -> p ,
                          Q -> q ,
                          R -> r ,
                          S -> s ,
                          T -> t ,
                          U -> u ,
                          V -> v ,
                          W -> w ,
                          X -> x ,
                          Y -> y ,
                          Z -> z ]
                          ;

define LengthSymbol [ ā -> â ,  
                      ē -> ê ,  
                      ī -> î ,  
                      ō -> ô ,
                      Ā -> â ,
                      Ē -> ê ,
                      Ī -> î ,
                      Ō -> ô ,
                      e -> ê ]
                      ;

! th rules 

define thiRule [ t h i ] -> ᖨ ;
define theRule [ t h e ] -> ᖧ ;
define thoRule [ t h o ] -> ᖪ ;
define thaRule [ t h a ] -> ᖬ ; 

! with w

! 3-letter symbols

define cwaRule [ c w a ] -> ᒝ  ;  
define cwiRule [ c w i ] -> ᒕ  ;  
define cwoRule [ c w o ] -> ᒙ  ;  
define cwâRule [ c w â ] -> ᒟ  ;  
define cwêRule [ c w ê ] -> ᒓ  ;  
define cwîRule [ c w î ] -> ᒗ  ;  
define cwôRule [ c w ô ] -> ᒛ  ;  

define kwaRule [ k w a ] -> ᑿ  ;  
define kwiRule [ k w i ] -> ᑷ  ;  
define kwoRule [ k w o ] -> ᑻ  ;  
define kwâRule [ k w â ] -> ᒁ  ;  
define kwêRule [ k w ê ] -> ᑵ  ;  
define kwîRule [ k w î ] -> ᑹ  ;  
define kwôRule [ k w ô ] -> ᑽ  ;  

define mwaRule [ m w a ] -> ᒷ  ;  
define mwiRule [ m w i ] -> ᒯ  ;  
define mwoRule [ m w o ] -> ᒳ  ;  
define mwâRule [ m w â ] -> ᒹ  ;  
define mwêRule [ m w ê ] -> ᒭ  ;  
define mwîRule [ m w î ] -> ᒱ  ;  
define mwôRule [ m w ô ] -> ᒵ  ;  

define nwaRule [ n w a ] -> ᓌ  ;  
define nwiRule [ n w i ] -> ᣇ  ;  
define nwoRule [ n w o ] -> ᣋ  ;  
define nwâRule [ n w â ] -> ᓎ  ;  
define nwêRule [ n w ê ] -> ᓊ  ;  
define nwîRule [ n w î ] -> ᣉ  ;  
define nwôRule [ n w ô ] -> ᣍ  ;  

define pwaRule [ p w a ] -> ᑅ  ;  
define pwiRule [ p w i ] -> ᐽ  ;  
define pwoRule [ p w o ] -> ᑁ  ;  
define pwâRule [ p w â ] -> ᑇ  ;  
define pwêRule [ p w ê ] -> ᐻ  ;  
define pwîRule [ p w î ] -> ᐿ  ;  
define pwôRule [ p w ô ] -> ᑃ  ;  

define swaRule [ s w a ] -> ᔁ  ;  
define swiRule [ s w i ] -> ᓹ  ;  
define swoRule [ s w o ] -> ᓽ  ;  
define swâRule [ s w â ] -> ᔃ  ;  
define swêRule [ s w ê ] -> ᓷ  ;  
define swîRule [ s w î ] -> ᓻ  ;  
define swôRule [ s w ô ] -> ᓿ  ;  

define twaRule [ t w a ] -> ᑢ  ;  
define twiRule [ t w i ] -> ᑚ  ;  
define twoRule [ t w o ] -> ᑞ  ;  
define twâRule [ t w â ] -> ᑤ  ;  
define twêRule [ t w ê ] -> ᑘ  ;  
define twîRule [ t w î ] -> ᑜ  ;  
define twôRule [ t w ô ] -> ᑠ  ;  

define ywaRule [ y w a ] -> ᔺ  ;  
define ywiRule [ y w i ] -> ᔲ  ;  
define ywoRule [ y w o ] -> ᔶ  ;  
define ywâRule [ y w â ] -> ᔼ  ;  
define ywêRule [ y w ê ] -> ᔰ  ;  
define ywîRule [ y w î ] -> ᔴ  ;  
define ywôRule [ y w ô ] -> ᔸ  ;  


! Without w
! two-letter symbols

define caRule [ c a ] -> ᒐ  ;  
define ciRule [ c i ] -> ᒋ  ;  
define coRule [ c o ] -> ᒍ  ;  
define câRule [ c â ] -> ᒑ  ;  
define cêRule [ c ê ] -> ᒉ  ;  
define cîRule [ c î ] -> ᒌ  ;  
define côRule [ c ô ] -> ᒎ  ;  

define kaRule [ k a ] -> ᑲ  ;  
define kiRule [ k i ] -> ᑭ  ;  
define koRule [ k o ] -> ᑯ  ;  
define kâRule [ k â ] -> ᑳ  ;  
define kêRule [ k ê ] -> ᑫ  ;  
define kîRule [ k î ] -> ᑮ  ;  
define kôRule [ k ô ] -> ᑰ  ;  

define maRule [ m a ] -> ᒪ  ;  
define miRule [ m i ] -> ᒥ  ;  
define moRule [ m o ] -> ᒧ  ;  
define mâRule [ m â ] -> ᒫ  ;  
define mêRule [ m ê ] -> ᒣ  ;  
define mîRule [ m î ] -> ᒦ  ;  
define môRule [ m ô ] -> ᒨ  ;  

define naRule [ n a ] -> ᓇ  ;  
define niRule [ n i ] -> ᓂ  ;  
define noRule [ n o ] -> ᓄ  ;  
define nâRule [ n â ] -> ᓈ  ;  
define nêRule [ n ê ] -> ᓀ  ;  
define nîRule [ n î ] -> ᓃ  ;  
define nôRule [ n ô ] -> ᓅ  ;  

define paRule [ p a ] -> ᐸ  ;  
define piRule [ p i ] -> ᐱ  ;  
define poRule [ p o ] -> ᐳ  ;  
define pâRule [ p â ] -> ᐹ  ;  
define pêRule [ p ê ] -> ᐯ  ;  
define pîRule [ p î ] -> ᐲ  ;  
define pôRule [ p ô ] -> ᐴ  ;  

define saRule [ s a ] -> ᓴ  ;  
define siRule [ s i ] -> ᓯ  ;  
define soRule [ s o ] -> ᓱ  ;  
define sâRule [ s â ] -> ᓵ  ;  
define sêRule [ s ê ] -> ᓭ  ;  
define sîRule [ s î ] -> ᓰ  ;  
define sôRule [ s ô ] -> ᓲ  ;  

define taRule [ t a ] -> ᑕ  ;  
define tiRule [ t i ] -> ᑎ  ;  
define toRule [ t o ] -> ᑐ  ;  
define tâRule [ t â ] -> ᑖ  ;  
define têRule [ t ê ] -> ᑌ  ;  
define tîRule [ t î ] -> ᑏ  ;  
define tôRule [ t ô ] -> ᑑ  ;  

define waRule [ w a ] -> ᐘ  ;	
define wiRule [ w i ] -> ᐏ  ;	
define woRule [ w o ] -> ᐓ  ;	
define wâRule [ w â ] -> ᐚ  ;
define wêRule [ w ê ] -> ᐍ  ;	
define wîRule [ w î ] -> ᐑ  ;	
define wôRule [ w ô ] -> ᐕ  ;	

define yaRule [ y a ] -> ᔭ  ;  
define yiRule [ y i ] -> ᔨ  ;  
define yoRule [ y o ] -> ᔪ  ;  
define yâRule [ y â ] -> ᔮ  ;  
define yêRule [ y ê ] -> ᔦ  ;  
define yîRule [ y î ] -> ᔩ  ;  
define yôRule [ y ô ] -> ᔫ  ;  

define hkRule [ h k ] -> ᕽ  ;  
define thRule [ t h ] -> ᔭ ;

! one-letter symbols

define aRule [ a ] -> ᐊ  ;  
define iRule [ i ] -> ᐃ  ;  
define oRule [ o ] -> ᐅ  ;  
define âRule [ â ] -> ᐋ  ;  
define êRule [ ê ] -> ᐁ  ;  
define îRule [ î ] -> ᐄ  ;  
define ôRule [ ô ] -> ᐆ  ;    
 
define cRule [ c ] -> ᐨ  ; 
define hRule [ h ] -> ᐦ  ; 
define kRule [ k ] -> ᐠ  ; 
define mRule [ m ] -> ᒼ  ; 
define nRule [ n ] -> ᐣ  ; 
define pRule [ p ] -> ᑊ  ; 
define sRule [ s ] -> ᐢ  ; 
define tRule [ t ] -> ᐟ  ; 
define wRule [ w ] -> ᐤ  ; 
define yRule [ y ] -> ᕀ  ; 


define lRule [ l ] -> ᓬ ; 
define rRule [ r ] -> ᕒ ;  

define spaceRule [ % ] -> [ %  %  %  ];
# define hyphenRule [ %- ] ->   ; # Hyphen to NBSP on request from A. Ogg. 
define hyphenRule [ %- ] -> [ %  ]; # standard space for hyphen alternative as more convenient input.

define FullStopRule [ %. ] -> ᙮ ;



 
read regex [ Decapitalisation
.o. LengthSymbol

.o. thiRule 
.o. theRule 
.o. thoRule 
.o. thaRule  

.o. cwaRule
.o. cwiRule
.o. cwoRule
.o. cwâRule
.o. cwêRule
.o. cwîRule
.o. cwôRule

.o. kwaRule
.o. kwiRule
.o. kwoRule
.o. kwâRule
.o. kwêRule
.o. kwîRule
.o. kwôRule

.o. mwaRule
.o. mwiRule
.o. mwoRule
.o. mwâRule
.o. mwêRule
.o. mwîRule
.o. mwôRule

.o. nwaRule
.o. nwiRule
.o. nwoRule
.o. nwâRule
.o. nwêRule
.o. nwîRule
.o. nwôRule

.o. pwaRule
.o. pwiRule
.o. pwoRule
.o. pwâRule
.o. pwêRule
.o. pwîRule
.o. pwôRule

.o. swaRule
.o. swiRule
.o. swoRule
.o. swâRule
.o. swêRule
.o. swîRule
.o. swôRule

.o. twaRule
.o. twiRule
.o. twoRule
.o. twâRule
.o. twêRule
.o. twîRule
.o. twôRule

.o. ywaRule
.o. ywiRule
.o. ywoRule
.o. ywâRule
.o. ywêRule
.o. ywîRule
.o. ywôRule


.o. caRule
.o. ciRule
.o. coRule
.o. câRule
.o. cêRule
.o. cîRule
.o. côRule

.o. kaRule
.o. kiRule
.o. koRule
.o. kâRule
.o. kêRule
.o. kîRule
.o. kôRule

.o. maRule
.o. miRule
.o. moRule
.o. mâRule
.o. mêRule
.o. mîRule
.o. môRule

.o. naRule
.o. niRule
.o. noRule
.o. nâRule
.o. nêRule
.o. nîRule
.o. nôRule

.o. paRule
.o. piRule
.o. poRule
.o. pâRule
.o. pêRule
.o. pîRule
.o. pôRule

.o. saRule
.o. siRule
.o. soRule
.o. sâRule
.o. sêRule
.o. sîRule
.o. sôRule

.o. taRule
.o. tiRule
.o. toRule
.o. tâRule
.o. têRule
.o. tîRule
.o. tôRule

.o. waRule
.o. wiRule
.o. woRule
.o. wâRule
.o. wêRule
.o. wîRule
.o. wôRule

.o. yaRule
.o. yiRule
.o. yoRule
.o. yâRule
.o. yêRule
.o. yîRule
.o. yôRule

.o. hkRule
.o. thRule

.o. aRule 
.o. iRule 
.o. oRule 
.o. âRule 
.o. êRule 
.o. îRule 
.o. ôRule 

.o. cRule 
.o. hRule 
.o. kRule 
.o. mRule 
.o. nRule 
.o. pRule 
.o. sRule 
.o. tRule 
.o. wRule 
.o. yRule

.o. lRule 
.o. rRule 

.o. spaceRule
.o. hyphenRule 

.o. FullStopRule ] ; 
